District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-1942

Head of Department of Military Science and Tactics; salary.

Repealed.

History

July 29, 1946, 60 Stat. 708, ch. 693, § 1
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 31, 36 DCR 492

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1005.
1973 Ed., § 31-622a.